Arkansas statutes. Title 28 Wills, Estates, and Fiduciary Relationships
Chapter 49 Management Of Assets
An affidavit to a claim against an estate which alleged that the account was “just and true” and that the amount named “is justly due after all just credits have been given” was a substantial compliance with former statute. Eddy v. Loyd, 90 Ark. 340, 119 S.W. 264 (1909) (decision under prior law).

A verification of a claim against an estate containing a clause “that the above account is true and just and unpaid after allowing all due credits and set-offs” was in substantial compliance with former statute. Breckenridge v. Weber Dry Goods Co., 167 Ark. 429, 268 S.W. 593 (1925) (decision under prior law).

Verification by one cognizant of the facts or by an agent or attorney was sufficient. Mason v. Bull, Ellis & Co., 26 Ark. 164 (1870) (decision under prior law).

The authentication required by former statute referred to suits against executors and administrators to subject the general assets of the estate to the payment of debts. Arkmo Lumber Co. v. Cantrell, 159 Ark. 445, 252 S.W. 901 (1923) (decision under prior law).

It was not contemplated by former statute that where a debt is assigned after it had been presented with proper authentication to an executor or administrator that any further or additional authentication should be necessary. Collier v. Trice, 79 Ark. 414, 96 S.W. 174 (1906) (decision under prior law).

Under former statute, the agents or attorneys of all persons, including corporations, were allowed and authorized to authenticate the claims of their principals against the estate of deceased persons. Orene Parker Co. v. Emerson, 91 Ark. 256, 120 S.W. 968 (1909) (decision under prior law).

The effect of former statute was to allow and authorize the agents or attorneys of all persons, including corporations, to authenticate the claims of their principals against the estates of deceased persons. Orene Parker Co. v. Emerson, 91 Ark. 256, 120 S.W. 968 (1909) (decision under prior law).

The probate of a claim against an estate made before a justice of the peace of another state whose official character was not authenticated was insufficient. Alter v. Kinsworthy, 30 Ark. 756 (1875) (decision under prior law).

All claims had to be authenticated. McIlroy Banking Co. v. Dickson, 66 Ark. 327, 50 S.W. 868 (1899) (decision under prior law).

A claim had to be authenticated although an administrator knows of its existence. Kaufman Bros. v. Redwine, 97 Ark. 546, 134 S.W. 1193 (1911) (decision under prior law).

The affidavit did not have to be signed by the affiant. Mahan v. Owen, 23 Ark. (10 Barber) 347 (1861) (decision under prior law).

A claim against an administrator as such was sufficiently authenticated where the claimant, after directing his son to sign his name to the claim, appeared before an officer and acknowledged and approved the signature. Chipman v. Perdue, 135 Ark. 559, 205 S.W. 892 (1918) (decision under prior law).

It was not error for court to allow a claimant to amend his claim to show it was for professional services when such an amendment followed a motion to make more definite and certain. Panick v. McLendon, 241 Ark. 576, 409 S.W.2d 497 (1966).

The heirs of a deceased whose estate was not administered upon had the right to file a claim in their own names for room and board furnished by the deceased against the estate of deceased debtor, the claim being filed in the language of former statute. Morris v. Arrington, 215 Ark. 564, 221 S.W.2d 406 (1949) (decision under prior law).

Where a son brought a suit to establish a contract with his deceased father and the court found against him, he was not later precluded from filing a claim against the estate for services rendered. Harris v. Whitworth, 213 Ark. 480, 211 S.W.2d 101 (1948) (decision under prior law).

It is essential that a claim against an estate be supported by an affidavit in statutory form, and relatively slight deviations from the statutory language may be fatal to the validity of the claim. Shelton v. Harris, 225 Ark. 855, 286 S.W.2d 20 (1956).

The alteration of the indorsement of disallowance on a claim filed with an administrator was sufficient to support a charge of forgery. Quertermous v. State, 114 Ark. 452, 170 S.W. 225 (1914) (decision under prior law).

An executor was not entitled to credit for claim against the estate which he paid and which was not verified and approved by the probate court, since statutes, with reference to verification and probation of claims, were mandatory and a will's direction to pay all just debts did not authorize payment without probate. Acker v. Watkins, 193 Ark. 192, 100 S.W.2d 78 (1936) (decision under prior law).

At the trial of a claim against a decedent's estate based upon a promissory note, though execution thereof had not been denied under oath before trial, the trial court properly requested claimant to identify the note in the absence of an affidavit and a copy of the note. George v. Davie, 201 Ark. 470, 145 S.W.2d 729 (1940) (decision under prior law).

Even though a claim paid was barred by the statute of nonclaim, the money could not be recovered. Rhodes v. Driver, 108 Ark. 80, 157 S.W. 147 (1913) (decision under prior law).

An executor who paid claims without claimant complying with former statute was not entitled to be subrogated to the rights of creditors whose claims he wrongfully paid. Acker v. Watkins, 199 Ark. 573, 134 S.W.2d 523 (1939) (decision under prior law).

While the provisions of former statute were mandatory, a substantial compliance was sufficient. Little v. Arkansas Trust & Banking Co., 124 Ark. 466, 187 S.W. 629 (1916) (decision under prior law).

Claim of a passenger's administrator against a pilot's estate arising out of the wrongful death of the passenger was in substantial compliance with this section because it did provide reasonable notice and relevant information to a pilot's administrator of a wrongful death action and allowed the pilot's administrator to make an informed decision. Attached to the claim was an order approving the retainer agreement between the passenger's estate and an attorney, which provided that it covered the claim against any insurance company of the pilot and the manufacturer or mechanic of the airplane.Banks v. Landry, 103 Ark. App. 47, 286 S.W.3d 183 (2008), rehearing denied, — Ark. App. —, — S.W.3d —, 2008 Ark. App. LEXIS 627 (Aug. 20, 2008).

Where no objection is made by an executor or administrator against the sufficiency of the form in which a claim is stated, he may be deemed to have waived the insufficiency. If the executor or administrator relies on defects in form in refusing to allow a claim, he should make known his objection seasonably. Jones v. Arkansas Farmers Ass'n, 232 Ark. 186, 334 S.W.2d 887 (1960).

Where eight claims were allowed by a court on the same day and the administrators subsequently filed a motion to vacate only one of the claims on the ground that the required notice of the hearing of a claim was not given them, it was probable that the administrators were present at the time of the hearing and the requirement was therefore waived, as participation in proceedings was a waiver of the notice requirement. Southern Furn. Co. v. Morgan, 214 Ark. 182, 214 S.W.2d 905 (1948) (decision under prior law).

Cited: Wolfe v. Herndon, 234 Ark. 543, 353 S.W.2d 540 (1962).

A claim approved by the personal representative must be filed with the court by or on behalf of the claimant within thirty (30) days after the expiration of six (6) months from the date of the first publication of the notice to creditors or it shall be barred, as provided in § 28-50-101.

A claim, disapproved or not acted upon by the personal representative, must be filed with the court by or on behalf of the claimant within the period fixed by § 28-50-101 or within thirty (30) days after the date of its presentation to the personal representative, whichever shall be the later date, or it shall be barred, as provided in § 28-50-101.

The purpose of this section is to effect and facilitate the payment of just claims against an estate within the specified time and not to defeat a just claim on a technicality that might entrap a claimant. Jones v. Arkansas Farmers Ass'n, 232 Ark. 186, 334 S.W.2d 887 (1960).

It was not contemplated that where a debt was assigned after it had been properly presented to an executor or administrator any further authentication would be necessary. Collier v. Trice, 79 Ark. 414, 96 S.W. 174 (1906) (decision under prior law).

Former statute applied to a claim of cestui que trust against the estate of a deceased trustee. Johnson v. Umsted, 64 F.2d 316 (8th Cir. 1933) (decision under prior law).

The filing of a claim by a seller, which was allowed by the buyer's administrator, did not, alone, amount to a waiver of the retention of title to fixtures under a conditional sales contract. Franklin Sav. Bank v. Garot, 69 F.2d 487 (8th Cir. 1934) (decision under prior law).

The term “demand” was held to include all claims capable of assertion against an estate. Hayden v. Hayden, 105 Ark. 95, 150 S.W. 415 (1912) (decision under prior law).

Persons having claims based on a written contract had to present a copy of them, together with the original, to the executor or administrator, before the claimant could have judgment in a probate court. Friend v. Patterson, 150 Ark. 577, 234 S.W. 978 (1921) (decision under prior law).

Where the Arkansas trial court made no finding regarding the solvency of the decedent's estate, it was improper for the trial court to grant summary judgment on the Tennessee creditors'claims against the estate. There was no evidence to indicate that the creditors properly presented their claims in the ancillary action in the manner required by Arkansas law and within the time permitted by subdivision (a)(3) of this section.Ellingsen v. King, 2009 Ark. App. 655 (2009).

A probate court allowance had the force and dignity of a judgment; but no execution could be issued upon it nor demand made upon the personal representatives until payment was ordered by the court; and the court must not order payment until it first ascertained all the debts of its class and those having precedence and the amount of the assets. Fort v. Blagg, 38 Ark. 471 (1882) (decision under prior law).

Upon the presentation of a claim for allowance, an administrator was entitled to, and could require, the claimant to furnish him a copy of the account or evidence of debt upon which the claim was founded, but could also waive the copy. Borden v. Fowler, 14 Ark. (1 Barber) 471 (1854); Grimes v. Booth, 19 Ark. (6 Barber) 224 (1857) (decisions under prior law).

Where an executor chooses a federal forum to litigate all claims against an estate under rights conferred by 46 U.S.C. Appx. §§ 182-189, and matters of procedure under federal statute are in conflict with provisions of §28-50-101 and this section, the federal statutes will govern. Parham v. Pelegrin, 468 F.2d 719 (8th Cir. 1972).

Where an executor chooses a federal forum to litigate all claims against an estate under 46 U.S.C. §§ 182-189, and federal district court issues an injunction barring all actions, suits, and proceedings against estate other than those filed with the district court clerk, the failure by the claimants against an estate to comply with §28-50-101 by presenting claims to the personal representative of the estate is not ground for dismissal of the claims since, under this section, claims presented to the personal representative must thereafter be filed with the court and such a proceeding would be expressly forbidden by the district court's injunction. Parham v. Pelegrin, 468 F.2d 719 (8th Cir. 1972).

The failure of an administrator to comply literally with requirements of former statute was not sufficient to show fraud in allowing and paying claims. Walls v. Phillips, 204 Ark. 365, 162 S.W.2d 59 (1942) (decision under prior law).

An administrator was held not subject to garnishment. Gill v. Middleton, 60 Ark. 213, 29 S.W. 465 (1895) (decision under prior law).

An order of a probate court allowing a claim against an estate, presented for allowance at a term subsequent to the term at which the administrator was notified that it would be presented, was without jurisdiction of the person of the administrator and void. Baskins v. Wylds, 39 Ark. 347 (1882) (decision under prior law).

The clause of a former statute requiring notice to be given an executor or administrator of an application was imperative; a probate court could take no jurisdiction of his person until the notice was given or waived. Pennington's Adm'x v. Gibson, 6 Ark. (1 English) 447 (1845) (decision under prior law).

Before a creditor could apply to a probate court to allow and class his claim against the estate of a deceased person, he had to first present it to the administrator for allowance and, upon his refusal to allow the claim, give him due notice of his intended application to the probate court. Hudson v. Breeding, 7 Ark. (2 English) 445 (1847) (decision under prior law).

A personal delivery of a copy of a claim to the personal representative is sufficient compliance with the requirement of sending notice by registered mail. Merritt v. Rollins, 231 Ark. 384, 329 S.W.2d 544 (1959) (decision prior to 1967 amendment).

Notice to a personal representative may be given before or after a claim has been filed with a court when both events take place on the same day. Merritt v. Rollins, 231 Ark. 384, 329 S.W.2d 544 (1959).

A trial court was not justified in striking a claim where, due to recitation of the name of the wrong county in caption, the county clerk failed to give notice to an executor as provided by this section, since executor's attorney received a copy of the claim within the statutory period for notice. Edwards v. Brimm, 236 Ark. 588, 367 S.W.2d 433 (1963).

An executor was not entitled to credit for claims against an estate which he paid and which were not verified and approved by the probate court, since statutes with reference to verification and probation of claims were held to be mandatory and a will's direction to pay all just debts did not authorize payment without probate. Acker v. Watkins, 193 Ark. 192, 100 S.W.2d 78 (1936) (decision under prior law).

A statement of an account against an estate, setting out the amounts of shipments of merchandise as of certain dates and credits thereon, was sufficiently itemized under former statute. Breckenridge v. Weber Dry Goods Co., 167 Ark. 429, 268 S.W. 593 (1925) (decision under prior law).

An action by bank commissioner against the executor of a deceased stockholder to recover assessment on bank stock should not have been dismissed for failure to exhibit claim to the probate court for allowance, as it was not a claim based on contract or torts, but was a statutory liability. Berlin v. Rainwater, 174 Ark. 66, 294 S.W. 368 (1927) (decision under prior law).

Where a person had a claim against an estate in the form of a note, the filing of a verbatim copy thereof with an affidavit attached was substantial compliance with former statute. Davenport v. Davenport, 110 Ark. 222, 161 S.W. 189 (1913); Keffer v. Stuart, 127 Ark. 498, 193 S.W. 83 (1917) (decisions under prior law).

A claim for balance due on mortgage containing affidavit that the claim was founded on a promissory note, that a true copy thereof was attached as an exhibit, and that the original had been exhibited to executor and was held subject to his inspection and to the orders of the court was in substantial compliance with former statute. Driver v. Driver, 200 Ark. 500, 139 S.W.2d 401 (1940) (decision under prior law).

Substantial compliance with the requirements of law for the presentation of claims is sufficient. Merritt v. Rollins, 231 Ark. 384, 329 S.W.2d 544 (1959).

An executor's motion to transfer a cause to equity on appeal from probate court's judgment restating the account of the executor and charging him with demands paid out by him and not probated in the manner prescribed by statute, on ground that the executor was entitled to subrogation as to the rights of creditors of the estate whose claims had been discharged, was properly denied. Watkins v. Acker, 195 Ark. 203, 111 S.W.2d 458 (1937) (decision under prior law).

Executors having knowledge that a note signed by their testator was due and unpaid could waive exhibition of the original note. Abston-Wynne & Co. v. Wasson, 186 Ark. 929, 56 S.W.2d 1029 (1933) (decision under prior law).

The appearance of an administrator in a probate court on an application for the allowance of a claim against him as administrator and his consent to a continuance were substantive acts dispensing with service of process and making him a party to the cause. Rogers v. Conway, 4 Ark. (4 Pike) 70 (1842); State Bank v. Walker, 14 Ark. (1 Barber) 234 (1853) (decisions under prior law).

Where an administrator sued in a probate court appeared and contested a claim, he waived the objection of want of prior presentation to him for allowance of the claim sued on. Leake & Harvey v. Sutherland, 25 Ark. 219 (1868) (decision under prior law).

A waiver of notice indorsed on a claim was tantamount to a rejection and reference of it to a probate court. Randolph v. Ward, 29 Ark. 238 (1874) (decision under prior law).

If an administrator appeared and did any substantive act in a cause, before judgment, it would be a waiver of notice. Baskins v. Wylds, 39 Ark. 347 (1882) (decision under prior law).

Cited: Boyd v. Matthews, 239 Ark. 112, 388 S.W.2d 102 (1965); Doss v. Taylor, 244 Ark. 252, 424 S.W.2d 541 (1968).

The order allowing the claim shall have the effect of a judgment and bear interest at the legal rate unless the claim provides otherwise, in which case the judgment shall be rendered accordingly.

Limitations shall begin to run the day the claim is allowed, and such an allowed claim may be revived in the same manner as judgments at law.

Publisher's Notes. The Probate Code, referred to in this section, is codified as set out in the note following §28-1-101.

Ark. L. Rev.

Haught, 1988 Update to the Arkansas Probate System: An Overview of Recent Developments in Arkansas Probate Practice, 42 Ark. L. Rev. 631.

U. Ark. Little Rock L.J.

Survey — Probate, 10 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 599.

The 1967 amendment of subsection (a) of this section was intended to change the holding of Brown v. Hanauer, 48 Ark. 277, 3 S.W. 27 (1887), that the 10-year statute of limitations generally applicable to judgments did not begin to run until the closing of an estate. This amendment was also intended to change the holding of Rose v. Thompson, 36 Ark. 254 (1880), that the statute for reviving judgments did not apply to probate court judgments.

Widow's argument that a circuit court erred in allowing a coexecutor of a decedent's estate any fee on his claim against the estate for legal services he provided from 1981 until the decedent's death failed because the widow did not contest the fact that the coexecutor provided the services reflected in his statement and, while the circuit court started with the premise that the coexecutor was to repay the entire amount of his claim, with interest, because the claim was originally paid without court approval, the circuit court then proceeded to consider the claim anew and determined that $10,000 was a reasonable fee for the coexecutor's services to the decedent, under this section and §28-50-107.Taylor v. Woods, 102 Ark. App. 92, 282 S.W.3d 285 (2008), rehearing denied, — Ark. App. —, — S.W.3d —, 2008 Ark. App. LEXIS 625 (Aug. 20, 2008).

The allowance and classification of a claim were conclusive after the expiration of the term, and a court had then no power to set aside. Cossit v. Biscoe, 12 Ark. (7 English) 95 (1851); McMorrin v. Overholt, 14 Ark. (1 Barber) 244 (1853); Jackson v. Gorman, 70 Ark. 88, 66 S.W. 346 (1902) (decisions under prior law).

A demand allowed, classified, and adjudged by a probate court had the same effect as a judgment. Wright v. Campbell & Strong, 27 Ark. 637 (1872); Hoshall v. Brown, 102 Ark. 114, 143 S.W. 1081 (1912). See also Tate v. Norton, 94 U.S. 746, 24 L. Ed. 222 (1877); Shofner v. Jones, 201 Ark. 540, 145 S.W.2d 350 (1940) (decisions under prior law).

It was not error for a probate court to grant the petition of an administrator to grant a lien upon a decedent's real estate and to revive a judgment allowing claims, as this section specifically gives an order allowing claims against an estate the effect of a judgment and §28-1-104 gives the probate court the same powers to carry out its judgments as exist in courts of general jurisdiction. Price v. Price, 253 Ark. 1124, 491 S.W.2d 793 (1973).

Where it appeared that an administrator allowed a claim in part and rejected or failed to act upon the remainder and a probate court acted upon the allowance only, or the probate court allowed the entire claim, but, by mistake, judgment was entered for a lesser sum, the remedy in the probate court was adequate and resort to equity was unnecessary. Page v. Ralph, 55 Ark. 52, 17 S.W. 365 (1891) (decision under prior law).

Chancery could set aside an allowance for fraud. Scott v. Penn, 68 Ark. 492, 60 S.W. 235 (1900) (decision under prior law).

Money advanced by a creditor to an administrator to improve the real estate of his intestate and to protect it against an attachment suit should have been allowed, if at all, as expenses of administration. Nathan v. Lehman, Abraham & Co., 39 Ark. 256 (1882) (decision under prior law).

The probate judge has authority to approve legal fees in excess of the statutory legal fees under §28-48-108(d) and to approve accounting fees under §28-48-108(e). Morris v. Cullipher, 306 Ark. 646, 816 S.W.2d 878 (1991).

Trial court's order requiring the executrix to pay the fees of an attorney for the former executrix violated subdivision (a)(3) of this section where the executrix had timely objected to the amended claim, but no hearing was set or held.Wingate-Mickles v. Harris, 2016 Ark. App. 253 (2016).

Illegality in the allowance of a claim could not be set up in a collateral proceeding. Mays v. Rogers, 37 Ark. 155 (1881) (decision under prior law).

Where a guardian had died, his wards should have presented against his estate several claims for their respective shares and not a joint claim for the whole, but the probate court, being bound to no course of procedure, could sever a demand for the whole and allow to each the sum to which he was entitled. Connelly v. Weatherford, 33 Ark. 658 (1878) (decision under prior law).

Section 20-76-436 creates a debt of medicaid payments upon the death of the recipient, which may be asserted as a claim against the estate; the probate court has jurisdiction over such a claim pursuant to subdivision (a)(4) of this section. Estate of Wood v. Ark. Dep't of Human Servs., 319 Ark. 697, 894 S.W.2d 573 (1995).

A judgment of a probate court allowing and classifying a claim was res judicata as to all issues upon which it was based. Miller v. Oil City Iron Works, 184 Ark. 900, 45 S.W.2d 36 (1931) (decision under prior law).

An administrator had the right to take an appeal from a judgment of a probate court rejecting his intestate's claim and prosecute it to the same extent his intestate might have done. Davies v. Nichols, 52 Ark. 554, 13 S.W. 129 (1890) (decision under prior law).

Devisees not being parties could not appeal from an order of allowance. Scott v. Penn, 68 Ark. 492, 60 S.W. 235 (1900) (decision under prior law).

When an administrator died with assets due distributees, the trust estate in his hands became an indebtedness against the estate, which, like any other demand, had to be authenticated, allowed, and classed before payment. Purcelly v. Carter, 45 Ark. 299 (1885) (decision under prior law).

The fact that an administrator knew that a claim existed did not render its authentication unnecessary. Kaufman Bros. v. Redwine, 97 Ark. 546, 134 S.W. 1193 (1911) (decision under prior law).

The claim of a corporation against a decedent's estate had to be authenticated by the affidavit of the cashier or treasurer, the affidavit of the secretary being insufficient. Superior Oil & Gas Co. v. Sudbury, 146 Ark. 319, 225 S.W. 609 (1920) (decision under prior law).

Unpaid real estate commissions due a salesman from a number of transactions over a period of years from a deceased broker were not “wages of employees” under subsection (a)(2) of this section, which are given priority where the applicable assets of the estate are insufficient to pay all the claims, but rather, were considered to be subsection (a)(3) claims. Hicks v. McMinn, 248 Ark. 783, 453 S.W.2d 728, 52 A.L.R.3d 936 (1970).

A bill by a creditor of an estate to uncover assets and apply them to payment of debts should have been in behalf of all creditors of the same class, and if recovered, the court had to place the funds in a tribunal where the creditor might, with others, share pro rata, courts of equity having no power to order distribution. Jackson v. McNabb, 39 Ark. 111 (1882) (decision under prior law).

A nonresident creditor, by suing in federal courts, could acquire no right to subject the assets of estate to seizure and sale for satisfaction of his debt, thereby placing himself in a favored position over other creditors contrary to state law. Yonley v. Lavender, 88 U.S. (21 Wall.) 276, 22 L. Ed. 536 (1874) (decision under prior law).

A widow had a right to pay the funeral expenses and to claim reimbursement as a creditor of the first class, but she could not wait more than six months and then receive the benefits of priority. Burns v. Wegman, 200 Ark. 225, 138 S.W.2d 389 (1940) (decision under prior law).

Reasonable cost of a tombstone was properly classed as a funeral expense. Holt v. Cassinelli, 203 Ark. 1138, 160 S.W.2d 877 (1942) (decision under prior law).

Because an estate was insolvent, the probate court correctly ordered the estate assets sold to pay claims and expenses of administration. Acklin v. Riddell, 42 Ark. App. 230, 856 S.W.2d 322 (1993).

A widow, later appointed administrator, confused the liability of the widow for the funeral expenses with the liability of the estate of the deceased for these expenses, and since it goes without question that the estate of the decedent is chargeable for the reasonable and necessary expense of interment, as it was stipulated that the funeral director's claim was reasonable, it would go without question that interment of the dead body was a necessary expense, and in fact was a necessary undertaking. Dutton v. Brashears Funeral Home, 235 Ark. 120, 357 S.W.2d 265 (1962).

A claim founded on a judgment lost its priority if not presented to the administrator within one year after the grant of his letters and should have been classed in the last class. Keith v. Parks, 31 Ark. 664 (1877) (decision under prior law).

Where confirmation of foreclosure sale was set aside and deed cancelled, but judgment and sale were never set aside and sale was again confirmed after mortgagor's death leaving a deficiency judgment, a claim therefor was one of the second class. Commonwealth Fed. Sav. & Loan Ass'n v. Thornton, 205 Ark. 298, 168 S.W.2d 430 (1943) (decision under prior law).

Funeral expenses were payable in preference to items of the second and third class, but the right of priority could be lost by failure to present the claim within six months. Burns v. Wegman, 200 Ark. 225, 138 S.W.2d 389 (1940) (decision under prior law).

The estate of a deceased person in the hands of his administrator was not liable to pay for medical services rendered to the family of a deceased after his death. Bomford v. Grimes, 17 Ark. (4 Barber) 567 (1856) (decision under prior law).

An executor or administrator had no power to sell, assign, or dispose of a note or debt due the testator or intestate in payment of one creditor before it was, upon settlement, ascertained how much was due him, to the exclusion of others, and such a sale or transfer vested no title. Whittaker v. Wright, 35 Ark. 511 (1880) (decision under prior law).

Where a claim had been filed in a probate court, it was not error for a circuit court to dismiss a counterclaim based on the claim in replevin action against the claimant. Pettit v. Kilby, 232 Ark. 993, 342 S.W.2d 93 (1961).

A circuit court's refusal to consider a claim for funeral expenses was without prejudice to the claimant's right to proceed in a probate court. Pettit v. Kilby, 232 Ark. 993, 342 S.W.2d 93 (1961).

An administrator had no power to bind the assets in his hands by making an agreement that a probated claim for debt contracted by intestate be set off against debt due estate contracted by claimant when he purchased lands sold by the administrator. Bishop v. Dillard, 49 Ark. 285, 5 S.W. 341 (1887) (decision under prior law).

Upon the death of a trustee, his indebtedness to the trust became a demand against his estate, to be authenticated, allowed, classed, and paid out of the assets of his estate as other demands. Hill v. State, 23 Ark. (10 Barber) 604 (1861); Patterson v. McCann, 39 Ark. 577 (1882) (decisions under prior law).

Cited: Woolsey v. Nationwide Ins. Co., 884 F.2d 381 (8th Cir. 1989); Ferguson v. Ferguson, 2009 Ark. App. 549, 334 S.W.3d 425 (2009).

History.

Acts 1949, No. 140, § 105.1, as added by Acts 1951, No. 255, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 62-2412.1.